Maryland, session 2026, HB0540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
4–203.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0540*

HOUSE BILL 540
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY
THAT IS AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY, A GAS COMPANY, OR A
COMBINATION GAS AND ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC
UTILITY OR AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN § 4–203 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, UNLESS OTHERWISE ORDERED BY THE COMMISSION, A PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY MAY NOT INITIATE A PROCEEDING THAT MAY LEAD TO A RATE CHANGE
UNLESS THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY:
(1) NOTIFIES CUSTOMERS, THROUGH A BILL INSERT OR SEPARATE
E–MAIL:
(I) THAT THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY IS INITIATING A
PROCEEDING THAT MAY LEAD TO A RATE CHANGE;
(II) OF THE RELEVANT PROCEDURAL DATES; AND
(III) WHERE TO FIND INFORMATION REGARDING THE RATE
CHANGE ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE; AND
(2) PREPARES AND PUBLISHES A 10–YEAR RATE TREND REPORT
THAT:
(I) INCLUDES A VISUAL GRAPHIC DEPICTING THE 10–YEAR
RATE CHANGE TREND, INCLUDING AN INDICATION OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE
RATE CHANGE AND INCREMENT BY WHICH THE RATE CHANGED;
(II) IDENTIFIES COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH TRANSMISSION,
DISTRIBUTION, AND STANDARD–OFFER OR COMMODITY SERVICE; AND
(III) ACCOUNTS FOR ALL CUSTOMER BILL LINE ITEMS,
INCLUDING RATE RIDERS.
(C) A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY SHALL INCLUDE IN EACH RETAIL
CUSTOMER’S BILL AND AUTOMATIC PAYMENT E–MAIL THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT:
“THE MARYLAND GENERAL ASSEMBLY ESTABLISHED THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMMISSION TO REGULATE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANIES DOING BUSINESS IN
MARYLAND. TODAY, THE COMMISSION SUPERVISES AND REGULATES THE
ACTIVITIES OF PRIVATELY OWNED PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANIES, INCLUDING GAS

HOUSE BILL 540 3
AND ELECTRIC COMPANIES, TO ENSURE THEIR ACTIVITIES ARE CONSISTENT WITH
THE PUBLIC INTEREST. FOR INFORMATION ON HOW TO PARTICIPATE IN OR
OBSERVE A PROCEEDING BEFORE THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION, PLEASE
VISIT THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE.”.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, AND EACH JANUARY 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF
PEOPLE’S COUNSEL, SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE AN ANNUAL
RATE REPORT FOR EACH PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY OPERATING IN THE STATE.
(2) THE ANNUAL RATE REPORT SHALL EXPLAIN, IN NONTECHNICAL
TERMS, THE OBSERVED RATE TRENDS.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL USE INFORMATION PROVIDED BY A
PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY IN A RATE TREND REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION TO DEVELOP THE ANNUAL RATE REPORT.
(4) EACH YEAR, A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY SHALL:
(I) DISTRIBUTE TO EACH RETAIL CUSTOMER A BILL INSERT
THAT INCLUDES THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY’S ANNUAL RATE REPORT
DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) POST THE ANNUAL RATE REPORT ON THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY’S WEBSITE.
(5) THE OFFICE OF PEOPLE’S COUNSEL SHALL BRING A CASE TO THE
COMMISSION IF THE OFFICE DETERMINES THAT AN ANNUAL RATE REPORT
PUBLISHED BY THE COMMISSION INCLUDES INCORRECT OR MISLEADING
INFORMATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.